Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-419
Board; expenses; payment.

The trustees composing the board shall serve without compensation but may appropriate and disburse sufficient of the funds in their control by filing a request for such trust funds, to be ordered, sworn to, and allowed by the trustees as other requests for payment from such county, to pay the expenses of administering their trusts.

Laws 1941, c. 148, § 10, p. 587;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 72-420;

R.S.1943, § 72-419;

Laws 1988, LB 864, § 9.